Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Licensing of Psychological Associates.

Administrative Code. —

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 60, art. 3.

Sec. 08.86.160.
Licensing requirements.

The board shall issue a psychological associate license to a person who

holds an earned master’s degree from an academic institution whose program of graduate study for a master’s degree in psychology meets the criteria established by the board by regulation in

clinical psychology;

counseling psychology; or

education in a field of specialization considered equivalent by the board;

has not engaged in dishonorable conduct related to the practice of counseling or psychometry;

has two years of post master’s supervised experience approved by the board; and

takes and passes the objective examination developed or approved by the board for psychological associates.

The board may not deny recognition as an accredited or approved academic institution to an educational institution solely because its program has not been accredited by a professional organization of psychologists.

History.

(§ 5 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 4 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 08.86.162.
Qualifications for associates’ examination.

A person is entitled to take a psychological associate examination if the board finds that the person

has not engaged in dishonorable conduct related to the practice of counseling or psychometry;

holds a master’s degree with primary emphasis on psychology from an academic institution whose program of graduate study for a master’s degree in psychology meets the criteria established by the board by regulation, with the equivalent of at least 48 semester credit hours of graduate course work directly related to a specialized area of psychology in which licensure is requested, including a practicum; and

has the recommendation of an immediate supervisor if a licensed psychologist, or two licensed psychologists who hold doctoral degrees.

History.

(§ 5 ch 65 SLA 1973; am §§ 11, 12, 21 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 1992; am § 11 ch 51 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

The definition of “supervised experience” in former (3) of this section was enacted as an amendment to AS

08.86.230

(11). Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 60, art. 3.

Sec. 08.86.164.
Scope of practice by associate.

A psychological associate shall be licensed to provide psychological services within the nature and extent of the psychological associate’s training and experience as defined in regulation.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 51 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 51 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 51 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 51 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 13 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1986; am §§ 5, 11 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 60, art. 4.

Sec. 08.86.166.
Temporary license.

The board may issue a temporary license to a person who meets the requirements of AS

08.86.160(a)(1)

, (2), and (4). A temporary license issued under this section is valid only for the time period identified in the person’s plan for the purpose of obtaining supervised experience to meet the requirement of AS

08.86.160(a)(3)

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.